Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,126
Quality of care; procedures established.

Each health maintenance organization shall establish procedures to assure that the health care services provided to enrollees are rendered under reasonable standards of quality of care consistent with prevailing professionally recognized standards of medical practice. Such procedures shall include mechanisms to assure availability, accessibility, and continuity of care.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 35.